Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2217.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1512.2. Recess and Lunch Periods.--(a) A school entity shall provide each student at least thirty minutes of recess during each school day in full-day kindergarten through grade five, at least fifteen minutes of recess during each school day in half-day kindergarten, and at least thirty consecutive minutes of lunch during each school day in full-day kindergarten through grade twelve, subject to the following:(1) Students shall not be permitted to replace lunch time 12345678910111213141516171819 with additional coursework or instruction unless requested by the student.(2) Lunch time shall not be withheld, in whole or in part, as a disciplinary measure or as a make-up period for missed work, extra credit or testing.(3) A student shall be excused from a lunch period due to the observance of the student's religious beliefs, which may include the student not being physically present in a school cafeteria during a lunch period.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the ability of a school entity or its employes to withhold, in whole or in part, recess as a disciplinary measure for violations of the school entity's code of student conduct established under 22 Pa. Code § 12.3(c) (relating to school rules) or other school entity policies or classroom rules.(5) A school entity may not reduce instructional time in subjects that are not assessed by a State assessment as defined in section 1502-I in order to provide recess, unless instructional time is also equitably reduced in subjects assessed by a State assessment.(6) A school entity may adjust and reduce the amount of recess time required under this section if the starting time or dismissal time of a school day is delayed or adjusted from normal times.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Kindergarten" means a one-year formal educational program that occurs during the school year immediately prior to first grade.20260HB2217PN2911 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Recess" means a period of time during the regular school day during which a student is given a break from structured classroom instruction and an opportunity to engage in physical activity, unstructured play or social interaction with other students. The term shall not include lunch time or a period of physical education as provided under section 1512.1."School entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.20260HB2217PN2911 - 3 - 12345678910